Utah statutes.
26-19-4.5.   Assignment of rights to benefits.
(1) (a)  To the extent that medical assistance is actually provided to a
recipient, all benefits for medical services or payments from a third party
otherwise payable to or on behalf of a recipient are assigned by operation of
law to the department if the department provides, or becomes obligated to
provide, medical assistance, regardless of who made application for the
benefits on behalf of the recipient.
(b)  The assignment:
(i)  authorizes the department to submit its claim to the third party and
authorizes payment of benefits directly to the department; and
(ii)  is effective for all medical assistance.
(2)  The department may recover the assigned benefits or payments in
accordance with Section 26-19-5 and as otherwise provided by law.
(3)  The assignment of benefits includes medical support and third party
payments ordered, decreed, or adjudged by any court of this state or any other
state or territory of the United States. That assignment is not in lieu of,
and does not supersede or alter any other court order, decree, or judgment.
(4)  When an assignment takes effect, the recipient is entitled to receive
medical assistance, and the benefits paid to the department are a
reimbursement to the department.
